California, session 20252026, AB331.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9094.6 is added to the Elections Code, to read:9094.6. (a) The Secretary of State shall prepare a state voter information guide for each county jail in the state in a format that will be accepted by county jail facilities and shall make that guide available to registered voters with a mailing address in a county jail facility.(b) The number of state voter information guides the Secretary of State makes available to registered voters inside each facility shall be equal to either of the following, as applicable:(1) At least 30 percent of the number of registered voters inside the facility, if the guides will be in a location accessible by all registered voters.(2) Equal to the number of registered voters inside the facility, if the guides will be delivered individually to each registered voter.(c) County jail officials shall work in good faith with the Secretary of State to ensure delivery of state voter information guides to their facilities for each primary and general election.SEC. 2. Section 13318 is added to the Elections Code, to read:13318. (a) County elections officials shall prepare county voter information guides for each county jail within their jurisdiction in a format that will be accepted by the county jail facility and shall make that guide available to registered voters with a mailing address in a county jail facility.(b) The number of county voter information guides the county elections officials make available to registered voters inside the facility shall be equal to either of the following, as applicable:(1) At least 30 percent of the number of registered voters inside the facility, if the guides will be in a location accessible by all registered voters.(2) Equal to the number of registered voters inside the facility, if the guides will be delivered individually to each registered voter.(c) County jail officials shall work in good faith with county election officials to ensure delivery of state and county voter information guides to their facilities for each primary and general election.SEC. 3. Section 15371 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15371. (a) Upon completion of the count, the elections official shall add to the results as so determined, the results of the write-in votes and any paper ballots used as certified by the precinct board, and thereupon shall declare the vote, and forthwith post one copy at the counting place for public inspection.(b) The duties imposed on election officials pursuant to subdivision (a) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.SEC. 4. Section 15372 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15372. (a) The elections official shall prepare a certified statement of the results of the election and submit it to the governing body within 30 days of the election or, in the case of school district, community college district, county board of education, or special district elections conducted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years, no later than the last Monday before the last Friday of that month.(b) The elections official shall post the certified statement of the results of the election on the elections official’s internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software application that is widely used at the time of the posting. The certified statement of the election results shall be posted and maintained on the elections official’s internet website for at least 10 years following the election. This subdivision shall apply only to an elections official who uses a computer system that has the capability of producing the election results in a downloadable spreadsheet format without requiring modification of the computer system.(c) The duties imposed on election officials pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.(d) (1)If the election elections official fails to prepare a certified statement of the results of the election as specified in subdivision (a), the election official shall immediately deliver all records and other information pertaining to the election, including all ballots and paper cast vote records, to the Secretary of State. the Secretary of State shall call the violation to the attention of the district attorney of the county or to the Attorney General and may assist the county elections official in discharging the officer’s duties, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.(2)After receipt of the records and information described in paragraph (1), the Secretary of State shall make all necessary determinations and certify the results of the election as soon as practicable.(3)The governing body and all other county staff necessary to complete the canvass and certification of the election shall be present and available at all times during the completion of the canvass and certification by the Secretary of State.(4)All costs associated with the completion of the canvass and certification of the election by the Secretary of State shall be borne by the county that fails to timely certify its election results.SEC. 5. Section 15375 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15375. (a) The elections official shall send to the Secretary of State within 31 days of the election in an electronic format in the manner requested one complete copy of all results as to each of the following:(1) All candidates voted for statewide office.(2) All candidates voted for the following offices:(A) Member of the State Assembly.(B) Member of the State Senate.(C) Member of the United States House of Representatives.(D) Member of the State Board of Equalization.(E) Justice of the Court of Appeal.(F) Judge of the superior court.(3) All persons voted for at the presidential primary. The results for all persons voted for at the presidential primary for delegates to national conventions shall be canvassed and shall be sent within 28 days after the election.(4) The vote given for persons for electors of President and Vice President of the United States. The results for presidential electors shall be endorsed “Presidential Election Returns” and shall be canvassed and sent within 28 days after the election.(5) All statewide measures.(6) The total number of ballots cast.(b) The duties imposed on election officials pursuant to subdivision (a) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.SEC. 6. Section 15400 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15400. (a) It is the ministerial and nondiscretionary duty of the governing body to declare elected or nominated to each office voted on at each election under its jurisdiction the person having the highest number of votes for that office, or who was elected or nominated under the exceptions noted in Section 15452.(b) It is the ministerial and nondiscretionary duty of the governing board to declare the results of each election under its jurisdiction as to each measure voted on at the election.SEC. 7. Section 18568 of the Elections Code is amended to read:18568. Every person is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, who:(a) Aids in changing or destroying any poll list or official ballot.(b) Aids in wrongfully placing any ballots in the ballot container or in taking any therefrom.(c) Adds or attempts to add any ballots to those legally polled at any election by fraudulently putting them into the ballot container, either before or after the ballots therein have been counted.(d) Adds to or mixes with, or attempts to add to or mix with, the ballots polled, any other ballots, while they are being counted or canvassed or at any other time, with intent to change the result of the election, or allows another to do so, when in the person’s power to prevent it.(e) Carries away or destroys, attempts to carry away or destroy, or knowingly allows another to carry away or destroy, any poll list, ballot container, or ballots lawfully polled or who willfully detains, mutilates, or destroys any election returns.(f) Removes any unvoted ballots from the polling place before the completion of the ballot count.(g) Displays a container or provides an envelope for the purpose of collecting or returning ballots, with the intent to deceive a voter into casting a ballot in an unofficial ballot or returning a ballot in an unofficial ballot return envelope. Evidence of intent to deceive may include using the word “official” on the container or envelope, or otherwise fashioning the container or envelope in a way that is likely to deceive a voter into believing that the container or envelope is an official collection box or official ballot return envelope that has been approved by an elections official.(h) Directs or solicits a voter to place a ballot in a container or envelope prohibited by subdivision (g).SEC. 8. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.